Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 14. Interstate Compact Relating to Juveniles.
§ 16.1-323.1.
State Council for Interstate Compact for Juveniles.

The Virginia Council for the Interstate Compact for Juveniles (the Council) is created as a policy council, within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government. The Council shall consist of five members:

One representative of the legislative branch appointed by the Joint Rules Committee;

One representative of the judicial branch appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;

One representative of the executive branch appointed by the Governor;

One nonlegislative citizen member, representing a victims’ group appointed by the Governor; and

One nonlegislative citizen member who in addition to serving as a member of the Council shall serve as the compact administrator for Virginia, appointed by the Governor.The appointments shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The legislative members and other state officials appointed to the Council shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Members who are not state officials shall be appointed for four-year terms. All members may be reappointed. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be made for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Council shall appoint the compact administrator as the Virginia commissioner to the Interstate Commission. The Virginia commissioner shall serve on the Interstate Commission in such capacity under or pursuant to the applicable laws of this Commonwealth.

The Council shall exercise oversight and advocacy concerning its participation in interstate commission activities and other duties as may be determined by the Council, including development of policies concerning operations and procedures of the compact within Virginia.

The Council shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman annually. A majority of the members of the Council shall constitute a quorum. Meetings of the Council shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

Legislative members of the Council shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation as provided in §

2.2-2813

for their services. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department of Juvenile Justice.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide staff support to the Council.

History.

2007, cc. 277, 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 277 and 387, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on the later of July 1, 2007, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, in substantially the form set out in §

16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia, by no less than 35 states as provided in §

16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice.” This section became effective August 26, 2008, when Illinois enacted the compact.

§§ 16.1-324 through 16.1-330.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 277 and 387, cl. 2, effective August 26, 2008.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 277 and 387, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on the later of July 1, 2007, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, in substantially the form set out in §

16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia, by no less than 35 states as provided in §

16.1-323

of the Code of Virginia. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice.” On August 26, 2008, Illinois enacted the compact.